Louisiana, session 2026, SB212.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1231.2(B), 1231.3(A), (C) and (F), and 1231.8(A)(1) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1231.2. Limitation of recovery
* * *
B.(1) The total amount recoverable for all malpractice claims for injuries to
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-290 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 212
or death of a patient, exclusive of past and future medical care and related benefits
as provided in R.S. 40:1231.3, and loss of past and future income or loss of
earning capacity, shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars plus interest and
cost for each claimant having a right of action.
(2) A health care provider qualified under this Part is not liable for an amount
in excess of one hundred thousand dollars plus interest thereon accruing after April
1, 1991, and costs specifically provided for by this Paragraph for all malpractice
claims because of injuries to or death of any one patient. The sole cost for which a
health care provider qualified under this Part may be assessed by a trial court shall
be limited to the cost incurred prior to the rendering of a final judgment against the
health care provider, not as a nominal defendant, after a trial on a malpractice claim,
including but not limited to, costs assessed pursuant to Code of Civil Procedure
Article 970 in any instance where the board was not the offeror or offeree of the
proposed settlement amount. The health care provider shall not be assessed costs in
any action in which the fund intervenes or the health care provider is a nominal
defendant after there has been a settlement between the health care provider and the
claimant.
(3) When there is an increase in the federal Consumer Price Index, with
respect to the amount of the foregoing limitation of liability set forth in this Part
from September 1, 1975, the liability limit prescribed in Paragraphs (1) and (2)
of this Subsection shall be increased by a sum equal to the amount of such limit
multiplied by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for Urban
Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) (seasonally adjusted, U.S. City
Average, All Items), as published by the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics,
between September 1, 1975, and the time at which damages subject to such
limits are awarded by final judgment.
(3)(4)(a) Any amount due from a judgment or settlement or from a final
award in an arbitration proceeding which is in excess of the total liability of all liable
health care providers, as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, shall be paid
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-290 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 212
from the patient's compensation fund pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
40:1231.4(C).
(b) The total amounts paid in accordance with Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
Subsection shall not exceed the limitation as provided in Paragraph Paragraphs (1)
and (2) of this Subsection, as modified by Paragraph (3) of this Subsection.
* * *
§1231.3. Future medical care and related benefits
A.
* * *
(3) If the total amount is for the maximum amount recoverable, exclusive of
the value of future medical care and related benefits that will be incurred after the
date of the response to the special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding, the
cost of all future medical care and related benefits that will be incurred after the date
of the response to the special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding shall be
paid in accordance with R.S. 40:1231.3(C). In all malpractice claims which
proceed to trial in which the plaintiff has established fault and causation of
injury and damages, and in which the plaintiff is found in need of future
medical care and related benefits, and the amount thereof has been established,
the court within thirty days of the date of the judgment shall hold a post-trial
evidentiary hearing on the issue of the competence of the patient, the tutor of
a minor patient, or, if interdicted, the patient's appointed curator, to manage
the future medical care and related benefits awarded by the judge or jury.
(a) If the court determines at the evidentiary hearing that the patient, the
tutor of the minor patient, or the patient's appointed curator is competent to
manage the future medical care and related benefits awarded by the jury, such
award shall be made executory, due and payable by the defendant provider
found liable at trial and by the Patient Compensation Fund as any other award
of damages in accordance with R.S. 40:1231.2(B).
(b) If the court determines at the evidentiary hearing that the patient, the
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-290 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 212
tutor of the minor patient, or the patient's appointed curator is not competent
to manage the future medical care and related benefits awarded by the jury, the
court shall set forth its reasons for such finding in writing in its judgment and
that portion of the award for future medical benefits and related benefits shall
be made in accordance with Subsection C of this Section.
(4) If the total amount is for the maximum amount recoverable, including the
value of the future medical care and related benefits, the amount of future medical
care and related benefits that will be incurred after the date of the response to the
special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding shall be deducted from the
total amount and shall be paid from the patient's compensation fund as incurred and
presented for payment. The remaining portion of the judgment, including the amount
of future medical care and related benefits incurred up to the date of the response to
the special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding shall be paid in accordance
with R.S. 40:1231.4(A)(7) and R.S. 40:1231.4(B)(2)(a), (b), and (c).
(5) In all cases where judgment is rendered for a total amount less than the
maximum amount recoverable, including any amount awarded on future medical
care and related benefits that will be incurred after the date of the response to the
special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding, payment shall be in
accordance with R.S. 40:1231.4(A)(7) and R.S. 40:1231.4(B)(2)(a), (b), and (c).
(6) The provisions of this Subsection shall be applicable to all malpractice
claims.
* * *
C. Once If a judgment is entered in favor of a patient who is found to be in
need of future medical care and related benefits that will be incurred after the date
of the response to the special interrogatory by the jury or the court's finding or a
settlement is reached between a patient and the patient's compensation fund in which
the provision of medical care and related benefits that will be incurred after the date
of settlement is agreed upon and continuing as long as medical or surgical attention
is reasonably necessary, the patient may make a claim to the patient's compensation
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-290 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 212
fund through the board for all future medical care and related benefits directly or
indirectly made necessary by the health care provider's malpractice unless the patient
refuses to allow them to be furnished in accordance with Subparagraph (A)(3)(b)
of this Section, the court shall order the funds awarded to be deposited by the
Patient Compensation Fund into a qualified trust as defined in 42 U.S.C.
§1396p(d)(4) for the benefit of the victim with any residual assets upon the
victim's death to be distributed to the victim's heirs or legatees.
* * *
F.E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent a patient and a
health care provider and/or the patient's compensation fund from entering into a
court-approved settlement agreement whereby medical care and related benefits shall
be provided for a limited period of time only or to a limited degree.
* * *
§1231.8. Medical review panel; certificate of merit
A.(1)(a)(i) All malpractice claims against health care providers covered by
this Part, other than claims validly agreed for submission to a lawfully binding
arbitration procedure, shall at the claimant's election be filed in a court of
competent jurisdiction with a certificate of merit or, prior to initiation of
judicial proceedings, be reviewed by a medical review panel established as
hereinafter provided for in this Section.
(ii) If the claimant elects to file a certificate of merit pursuant to this
Section, the certificate of merit shall be executed in the form of an affidavit by
the claimant, or the attorney for the claimant, or a licensed physician, declaring
under oath one of the following:
(aa) The affiant has reviewed the facts of the case as an expert, or in
consultation with at least one expert, who is qualified pursuant to the Louisiana
Code of Civil Procedure and the Louisiana Code of Evidence to give expert
testimony regarding the standard of care and negligence pertaining to the
subject matter and medical specialty relevant to the particular medical
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-290 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 212
malpractice claim being brought and that, on the basis of such review or
consultation, a reasonable, good faith basis for the commencement of such
action exists.
(bb) A physician licensed and board certified or otherwise qualified by
education or experience in the medical subject matter of the claim has reviewed
the available medical records pertinent to the alleged medical malpractice and
has concluded that the acts or omissions of the defendant did not meet the
medical standard of care applicable to the facts of the claim and caused or
contributed to the claimant's injuries or death.
(iii) If a claimant elects to file a certificate of merit, but is unable to
timely obtain the expert consultation required by this Section because to do so
would mean that prescription would bar bringing the medical malpractice
action, then the claimant may file a certificate of merit within ninety days of all
defendants having filed their answer. If within ninety days the claimant has not
filed a certificate of merit, the action shall be dismissed.
(iv) If a claimant in a medical malpractice action elects to file a
certificate of merit, the filing of a single certificate of merit shall be sufficient to
meet the requirements of this Section, even if more than one defendant has been
named in the medical malpractice petition or is subsequently named.
(v) The filing of a request for review by a medical review panel, if elected
by the claimant to be filed as provided for in this Section, shall not be reportable
by any health care provider, the Louisiana Patient's Compensation Fund, or any other
entity to the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners, to any licensing authority,
committee, or board of any other state, or to any credentialing or similar agency,
committee, or board of any clinic, hospital, health insurer, or managed care
company.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1231.3(E), (G), (H), (I), and (J) are hereby repealed.
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-290 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 212